Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.25.050

Depositories. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

Each candidate and each political committee shall designate and file with the commission the name and address of not more than one depository for each county in which the campaign is conducted in which the candidate's or political committee's accounts are maintained and the name of the account or accounts maintained in that depository on behalf of the candidate or political committee. The candidate or political committee may at any time change the designated depository and shall file with the commission the same information for the successor depository as for the original depository. The candidate or political committee may not be deemed in compliance with the provisions of this title until the information required for the depository is filed with the commission.

[ 2024 c 164 s 422; 2019 c 428 s 17; 2010 c 204 s 404. Formerly RCW 42.17A.215.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.